Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.140

Improper conduct not authorized.

Nothing in this chapter shall authorize a director, officer, shareholder, agent, or employee of a corporation organized under this chapter, or a corporation itself organized under this chapter, to do or perform any act which would be illegal, unethical, or unauthorized conduct under the provisions of the following acts: (1) Physicians and surgeons, chapter 18.71 RCW; (2) anti-rebating act, chapter 19.68 RCW; (3) state bar act, chapter 2.48 RCW; (4) professional accounting act, chapter 18.04 RCW; (5) professional architects act, chapter 18.08 RCW; (6) professional auctioneers act, chapter 18.11 RCW; (7) cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists, chapter 18.16 RCW; (8) assisted living facilities act, chapter 18.20 RCW; (9) podiatric medicine and surgery, chapter 18.22 RCW; (10) chiropractic act, chapter 18.25 RCW; (11) registration of contractors, chapter 18.27 RCW; (12) debt adjusting act, chapter 18.28 RCW; (13) dental hygienist act, chapter 18.29 RCW; (14) dentistry, chapter 18.32 RCW; (15) dispensing opticians, chapter 18.34 RCW; (16) naturopathic physicians, chapter 18.36A RCW; (17) embalmers and funeral directors, chapter 18.39 RCW; (18) engineers and land surveyors, chapter 18.43 RCW; (19) escrow agents registration act, chapter 18.44 RCW; (20) birthing centers, chapter 18.46 RCW; (21) midwifery, chapter 18.50 RCW; (22) nursing homes, chapter 18.51 RCW; (23) optometry, chapter 18.53 RCW; (24) osteopathic physicians and surgeons, chapter 18.57 RCW; (25) pharmacists, chapter 18.64 RCW; (26) physical therapy, chapter 18.74 RCW; (27) registered nurses, *advanced registered nurse practitioners, and practical nurses, chapter 18.79 RCW; (28) psychologists, chapter 18.83 RCW; (29) real estate brokers and salespersons, chapter 18.85 RCW; (30) veterinarians, chapter 18.92 RCW.

[ 2012 c 10 s 38; 2011 c 336 s 503; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 717; 1987 c 447 s 16; 1982 c 35 s 170; 1969 c 122 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.